Washington statutes.
RCW 27.40.010

Thomas Burke Memorial Washington State Museum constituted state natural history and anthropology museum.

The Thomas Burke Memorial Washington State Museum of the University of Washington is hereby constituted the state natural history and anthropology museum as a repository for the preservation, exhibition, interpretation, and conservation of documents and objects of a systematic anthropological, geological, and zoological character for the state.

[ 1985 c 29 s 1; 1899 c 30 s 1; RRS s 8255.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 29: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on June 30, 1985." [ 1985 c 29 s 3.]